Hawaii, session 2025, GM1245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
1 SECTION 1, Section 46-20.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
3 "(b) Upon demand by the department of Hawaiian home lands,
4 each county shall accept the license or dedication and ownership
5 of any and all sewer transmission lines and other sewerage
6 facilities servicing Hawaiian home lands and that are not
7 subject to subsection (a), as may be identified by the
8 department of Hawaiian home lands; provided that:
9 (1) Any sewer lines or other sewerage facilities:
10 (A) Not subject to subsection (a);
11 (B) Existing before [-t] July 7, 2014 [j-] ; and
12 (C) That the appropriate county determines are not in
13 substantial compliance with environmental laws,
14 rules, and regulations pertaining to the
15 dedication or license of the sewers to the
16 counties at the time of their construction.
2025-3428 HB1091 CDl HMSO
iiiinnwiHiinMiiii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
■ . s.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 shall be brought into compliance with those laws,
2 rules, and regulations by the department of Hawaiian
3 home lands [prior to] before acceptance by the county;
4 provided further that all sewer transmission lines and
5 related sewerage facilities servicing Hawaiian home
6 lands brought into compliance shall be accepted by a
7 county within sixty days after the receipt by the
8 appropriate county agency of a completed application
9 for maintenance request; and
10 (2) Sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities
11 completed after [-[-IJuly 7, 2014, [4-] shall comply with
12 all applicable federal, state, and county
13 environmental, design, and construction requirements
14 [prior to] before acceptance by a county."
15 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
16 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
17 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3428 HB1091 CDl HMSO

1091
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 30th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1091, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1091, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
107